Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.168

Voter signature verification—Community outreach plan.

(1) Each county auditor shall develop a community outreach plan to educate voters about signature verification requirements and the importance of ballot signatures matching signatures in voter registration files. The outreach plan shall include materials for publication on the county auditor's website and distribution in communities throughout the county that clearly explain signature verification requirements and the process of updating signatures in voter registration files or curing challenged ballots under RCW 29A.60.165. Materials prepared under the outreach plan should be written clearly and in plain language. Materials must be produced in English, Spanish, and any other language required by the federal voting rights act. Materials prepared as part of the outreach plan should be informed by the data collected in the survey required by RCW 29A.60.300 and should target groups with higher rates of ballot rejection. The secretary of state may assist in preparation of materials for a county's outreach plan, including coordinating between multiple counties and providing information about statewide requirements.

(2) County auditors are encouraged to establish partnerships with trusted community organizations as part of the community outreach plan to maximize resources.

[ 2024 c 269 s 5.]